Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,112.01
Strict liability in tort; when.

Any person engaged in the disposal of low-level radioactive waste shall be subject to strict liability in tort for property damage, bodily injury, or death resulting from such disposal.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 12.